Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1103
Department of Administrative Services; creation; director; appointment; service.

There is hereby created a department of government to be known as the Department of Administrative Services. The chief administrative officer of the department shall be the director to be known as the Director of Administrative Services. The director shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by a majority vote of members of the Legislature. The director shall serve at the discretion of the Governor.

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 3, p. 1693;

Laws 1967, c. 578, § 2, p. 1909.